Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-9001
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-9001 to
44-9011 shall be known and may be cited as the Risk Management and Own Risk
and Solvency Assessment Act.

Laws 2014, LB700, § 1.